Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-601
Telegraph companies; laws governing.

All associations organized or incorporated under the laws of this state, by and under authority of any other state, or by authority of the United States, whose object and purpose is the transmission, collection, and distribution of dispatches by telegraph, are subject to sections 86-602 to 86-610.

Laws 1883, c. 80, § 1, p. 321;

R.S.1913, § 7395;

C.S.1922, § 7070;

C.S.1929, § 86-101;

R.S.1943, § 86-101;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-101;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 363.